Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 2. Oil and Gas
§ 39-14-203.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following shall apply:

There is levied a severance tax on the value of the gross product extracted for the privilege of severing or extracting crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas in the state. The tax imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to all other taxes imposed by law including, but not limited to, ad valorem taxes imposed by W.S.

39-13-101

through

39-13-111

.

Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

Crude oil, lease condensate and natural gas shall be valued for taxation as provided in this subsection;

The fair market value for crude oil, lease condensate and natural gas shall be determined after the production process is completed. Notwithstanding paragraph (x) of this subsection, expenses incurred by the producer prior to the point of valuation are not deductible in determining the fair market value of the mineral;

The production process for crude oil or lease condensate is completed after extracting from the well, gathering, heating and treating, separating, injecting for enhanced recovery, and any other activity which occurs before the outlet of the initial storage facility or lease automatic custody transfer (LACT) unit;

The production process for natural gas is completed after extracting from the well, gathering, separating, injecting and any other activity which occurs before the outlet of the initial dehydrator. When no dehydration is performed, other than within a processing facility, the production process is completed at the inlet to the initial transportation related compressor, custody transfer meter or processing facility, whichever occurs first;

If the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas production as provided by paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection are consumed as defined by W.S. 39-14-201(a)(xv)(B), processed or transported, sold to a third party or processed or transported by a third party, at or prior to the point of valuation provided in paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection, the fair market value shall be the value established by bona fide arms-length transaction;

In the event the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas production as provided by paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection is not sold at or prior to the point of valuation by bona fide arms-length sale, or, except as otherwise provided, if the production is used without sale, the department shall identify the method it intends to apply under this paragraph to determine the fair market value and notify the taxpayer of that method on or before September 1 of the year preceding the year for which the method shall be employed. The department shall determine the fair market value by application of one (1) of the following methods:

Comparable sales — The fair market value is the representative arms-length market price for minerals of like quality and quantity used or sold at the point of valuation provided in paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection taking into consideration the location, terms and conditions under which the minerals are being used or sold;

Comparable value — The fair market value is the arms-length sales price less processing and transportation fees charged to other parties for minerals of like quantity, taking into consideration the quality, terms and conditions under which the minerals are being processed or transported;

Netback — The fair market value is the sales price minus expenses incurred by the producer for transporting produced minerals to the point of sale and third party processing fees. The netback method shall not be utilized in determining the taxable value of natural gas which is processed by the producer of the natural gas;

Proportionate profits — The proportionate profits method shall only be used as a method in conjunction with the provisions of the modified netback method in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph. The fair market value is:

The total amount received from the sale of the minerals minus exempt royalties, nonexempt royalties and production taxes times the quotient of the direct cost of producing the minerals divided by the direct cost of producing, processing and transporting the minerals; plus

Nonexempt royalties and production taxes.

Modified netback — The fair market value is:

The total amount received from the sale of the natural gas minus the total direct processing and transportation costs, any arms-length transportation fees from the point of valuation to the point of arms-length sale, overhead costs directly related to facility operations not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the total direct processing and transportation costs, exempt royalties and return on investment incurred by the taxpayer from the point of valuation to the point of arms-length sale;

There shall be one (1) point of valuation for all interest owners of the processing facility;

Any producer utilizing the modified netback method set forth in this subparagraph shall be required to calculate the taxable value for the tax year under the methods of both this subparagraph and subparagraph (D) of this paragraph (hereafter referred to as the “annual floor test”). The taxable value for the year shall be the higher of the two (2) taxable values determined under the annual floor test. If the valuation method is changed as a result of the provision in this subparagraph, no interest or penalties shall be due if the taxpayer files the amended returns and remits the additional severance tax due under this subparagraph not later than May 25 of that calendar year. After the first year of applicability of this subparagraph, for each succeeding year the taxpayer’s monthly severance tax returns shall be filed using the valuation method determined under the annual floor test for the immediately preceding calendar year.

When the taxpayer and department jointly agree, that the application of one (1) of the methods listed in paragraph (vi) of this subsection does not produce a representative fair market value for the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas production, a mutually acceptable alternative method may be applied;

If the fair market value of the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas production as provided by paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection is determined pursuant to paragraph (vi) of this subsection, the method employed shall be used in computing taxes for three (3) years including the year in which it is first applied or until changed by mutual agreement between the department and taxpayer. If the taxpayer believes the valuation method selected by the department does not accurately reflect the fair market value of the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas, the taxpayer may appeal to the board of equalization for a change of methods within one (1) year from the date the department notified the taxpayer of the method selected;

If the department fails to notify the taxpayer of the method selected pursuant to paragraph (vi) of this subsection, the taxpayer shall select a method and inform the department. The method selected by the taxpayer shall be used in computing taxes for three (3) years including the year in which it is first applied or until changed by mutual agreement between the taxpayer and the department. If the department believes the valuation technique selected by the taxpayer does not accurately reflect the fair market value of the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas, the department may appeal to the board of equalization for a change of methods within one (1) year from the date the taxpayer notified the department of the method selected;

If crude oil is enhanced prior to the point of valuation as defined in paragraph (iii) of this subsection by either a blending process with a higher grade hydrocarbon or through a refining process such as cracking, then the fair market value shall be the fair market value of the crude oil absent the blending or refining process;

For natural gas, the total of all actual transportation costs from the point where the production process is completed to the inlet of the processing facility or main transmission line shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the value of the gross product without approval of the department based on documentation that the costs are due to environmental, public health or safety considerations, or other unusual circumstances.

Taxpayer. The following shall apply:

In the case of ad valorem taxes on crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas produced under lease, the lessor is liable for the payment of ad valorem taxes on crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas production removed only to the extent of the lessor’s retained interest under the lease, whether royalty or otherwise, and the lessee or his assignee is liable for all other ad valorem taxes due on production under the lease;

In the case of severance taxes, any person extracting crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas and any person owning an interest in the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas production to the extent of their interest ownership are liable for the payment of the severance taxes together with any penalties and interest;

Any taxpayer paying severance taxes on any crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas production may deduct the taxes paid from any amounts due or to become due to the interest owners of such production in proportion to the interest ownership.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 10, § 1; 2008, ch. 28, § 1; 2021 ch. 156, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted the first sentence in the introductory language of (b)(vi)(D); and added (b)(vi)(E).

The 2021 amendment

, effective January 1, 2022, added "consumed as defined by W.S. 39-14-201(a)(xv)(B), processed or transported," in (b)(v).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, ch. 28, § 3, provides: “This act shall apply to all natural gas production occurring on and after January 1, 2009.”

Tax on nonhydrocarbon gases imposed. —

There is an excise tax upon the privilege of severing or extracting nonhydrocarbon gases, such as carbon dioxide, hydrogen sulfide, helium, nitrogen, etc. Amoco Prod. Co. v. State, 751 P.2d 379,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1988).

Helium. —

Where corporation with federal oil and gas leases produced natural gas from deep wells, and the composition of the natural gas stream produced from these deep wells was .6 percent helium, district court properly determined that severance and ad valorem taxes did not apply to the .6 percent helium, due to the unique circumstances created by Congress'
reservation of helium in the Mineral Leasing Act of 1920, and federal leases issued pursuant thereto. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Exxon Mobil Corp., 2007 WY 112, 162 P.3d 515,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2007), reh'g denied,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. Aug. 21, 2007).

Deduction disallowed. —

Taxpayer's deduction for fuel use under this section was properly denied because there was insufficient evidence to support the reported taxable value; without volume verification, the taxpayer was unable to show that the reported taxable value was the fair market price of production. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Guthrie, 2005 WY 79, 115 P.3d 1086,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2005).

Liability for taxes. —

In Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-203(c)(ii), the phrase “to the extent of their interest ownership” modifies “any person extracting” and “any person owning” and, read properly, the statute clearly provides that each owner is responsible for taxes to the extent of their ownership. Lance Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 156, 101 P.3d 899,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2004).

Production taxes and royalties of an owner of natural gas wells were not direct costs of production under this section; thus, the proportionate profits formula of the Department of Revenue did not have to be resolved in the owner's challenge of the assessment by a declaratory judgment action.
Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Exxon Mobil Corp., 2007 WY 21, 150 P.3d 1216,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2007).

Notice. —

Under review of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-37-109

, an owner of natural gas wells was properly granted declaratory judgment under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-37-103

,

1-37-114

, and

1-37-108

of the Uniform Declaratory Judgment Act, finding that the Department of Revenue had no authority to change the valuation methodology for production taxes and royalties without complying with the notice provisions of this section. Exhaustion of remedies was not required, and the primary jurisdiction doctrine did not apply because only questions of law were presented.
Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Exxon Mobil Corp., 2007 WY 21, 150 P.3d 1216,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2007).

Consideration of contracts to verify value of gas. —

In verifying the value of gas production for taxation purposes, the Wyoming Department of Revenue is required by this section to refer to the specific terms of the contracts. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Guthrie, 2005 WY 79, 115 P.3d 1086,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2005).

Hedging.

Debtor's hedges were financial swap contracts that were purely financial, derivative transactions meant to protect debtor from the volatility of the oil and gas markets; thus, because the hedges did not affect the market value of the gas at the well or on the leased property or generate any profits from actual production at the wellhead, the gains or losses were not included in the computation of plaintiffs' net profits interest. This reading of the contract was consistent with Wyoming law regarding imposition of severance taxes on oil and gas production. Hartman v. Ultra Petro. Corp. (In re Ultra Petro. Corp.), 571 B.R. 755, 2017 Bankr. LEXIS 1332 (Bankr. S.D. Tex. 2017).

Point of valuation of custody transfer meters. —

Custody transfer meter is an official measurer of gas as it passes from one entity to another for the other's immediate charge or control under this section, and the type of meter does not determine whether custody is being transferred at the meter. The Wyoming Department of Revenue's decision that the point of valuation was at an inlet to a compressor was affirmed because a taxpayer was unable to meet its burden of proof of showing that volume meters at certain wellheads were custody transfer meters. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 89, 94 P.3d 430,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2004).

State Board of Equalization did not err in finding that meters on an oil company's natural gas wells were not “custody transfer meters” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-203(b)(iv), and therefore not proper tax valuation points for the oil company's gas production, because the oil company retained custody and control over the natural gas both before and after it passed through the meters; the definitional requirement that the gas pass from one entity to another for the other's immediate charge or control was therefore not met.
Exxon Mobil Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2011 WY 161, 266 P.3d 944,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2011).

Production of transportation expenses. —

Taxpayer's argument that expenses incurred did not have to be directly related to the processing of gas steam to qualify as a production or transportation expense was rejected under the clear language of this section. Expenses for land lease and environmental permits were not direct costs. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 89, 94 P.3d 430,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2004).

Arm's length sale based upon index pricing. —

Standard volumetric production payment (VPP) was a financing agreement, but the corporation's VPP transaction included a series of exchanges for terms equivalent to cash based upon index pricing that produced an arm's length sale, and the point of valuation for the sale required application of the statute; however, that error was not brought to the Department of Revenue or Board of Equalization's attention until well after the audit, such that the error was de minimis and not required to remand for a recalculation. EOG Res., Inc. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 35, 86 P.3d 1280,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2004).

Direct Cost Ratio. —

Wyoming Department of Revenue's interpretation of its own administrative rule was to be given effect because it was consistent with the interpretation of this section; royalties and production taxes were not to be included as direct costs of producing. Excluding royalties and production taxes from the direct cost ratio provided a more reasonable interpretation of the statute.
RME Petroleum Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2007 WY 16, 150 P.3d 673,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2007).

Applied

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Exxon Mobil Corp. 2002 WY 151, 55 P.3d 714,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 39-14-204.
Tax rate.

Except as otherwise provided by this section and W.S.

39-14-205

, the total severance tax on crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas shall be six percent (6%), comprising one and one-half percent (1.5%) imposed by the Wyoming constitution article 15, section 19 and the remaining amount imposed by Wyoming statute. The tax shall be distributed as provided in W.S.

39-14-211

and is imposed as follows:

One and one-half percent (1.5%); plus

One-half percent (.5%); plus

Two percent (2%); plus

Two percent (2%) except as provided in W.S.

39-14-205

(n).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 168, § 1; 2000, ch. 4, § 1; 2016 ch. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2020 ch. 155, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted “except for the period January 1, 1999 through December 31, 1999, the rate for crude oil production under this paragraph shall be one percent (1%). If the average monthly price received by Wyoming crude oil producers as determined by the department of revenue equals or exceeds twenty dollars ($20.00) per barrel for three (3) consecutive months, the reduced tax rate of one percent (1%) specified in this paragraph for the period of January 1, 1999 through December 31, 1999 shall terminate” in (a)(iii) and (a)(iv).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iv) added “except as provided in W.S. 39-14-205(n)” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

§ 39-14-205.
Exemptions.

Stripper production is exempt from the severance taxes imposed by W.S. 39-14-204(a)(iii).

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 16, § 2.

In the case of tertiary production of crude oil resulting from injection of carbon dioxide gas, all Wyoming severance taxes paid on the carbon dioxide gas injected shall be deducted from and allowed as a credit against the severance taxes imposed on the oil produced by the injection.

through (g) Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 16, § 2.

Crude oil produced from previously shut-in wells is exempt from the severance taxes imposed by W.S. 39-14-204(a)(ii), (iii) and (iv) for the first sixty (60) months of renewed production or until the average price received by the producer for the renewed production is equal to or exceeds twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per barrel of oil for the preceding six (6) months, whichever sooner occurs.

Natural gas which is vented or flared under the authority of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission and natural gas which is reinjected or consumed prior to sale for the purpose of maintaining, stimulating, treating, transporting or producing crude oil or natural gas on the same lease or unit from which it was produced has no value and is exempt from taxation.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 16, § 2.

Natural gas which is consumed prior to sale for treating by-product water as defined in W.S.

41-3-903

so the water is acceptable for beneficial use in Wyoming has no value and is exempt from taxation.

Crude oil and natural gas production resulting from any well that is drilled on or after July 1, 2020 and prior to December 31, 2025 as certified, by the oil and gas conservation commission, is exempt from the severance taxes imposed by W.S. 39-14-204(a)(iv) as provided in this subsection. Subject to subsection (o) of this section, the exemption under this subsection shall not apply to natural gas production when the twelve (12) month rolling average of the Henry hub spot price for natural gas is two dollars and ninety-five cents ($2.95) or more per thousand cubic feet at the time of first production from the well and shall not apply to the production of crude oil when the twelve (12) month rolling average of the West Texas Intermediate (WTI) spot price of sweet crude oil is fifty dollars ($50.00) or more per barrel at the time of first production from the well. If the exemption under this subsection is applicable to a new well based upon the oil or gas price at the time of first production, the exemption shall be an exemption of the full two percent (2%) tax rate under W.S. 39-14-204(a)(iv) for the first six (6) months of production and shall reduce the rate under W.S. 39-14-204(a)(iv) to one percent (1%) for the next six (6) months of production.

In determining the exemption under subsection (n) of this section, the department shall use the twelve (12) month rolling average based on the monthly average of daily spot prices for West Texas Intermediate (WTI) per barrel of oil and the monthly average of daily spot prices for Henry hub per thousand cubic feet of natural gas for the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding first production from the well. The department shall post the most recent monthly average and the twelve (12) month rolling average for the calculated prices on its website. Not later than November 1 of each year, the department shall report to the joint revenue interim committee on the use of the exemptions under subsection (n) of this section, and associated revenue impacts.

Natural gas that is consumed on the site and would have otherwise been vented or flared under the authority of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission has no value and is exempt from taxation as long as the natural gas is certified by the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission as to have originated from a qualifying well.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 47, § 1; 2000, ch. 99, § 1; 2003, ch. 130, § 1; 2016 ch. 16, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 155, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 156, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, deleted former (b), (c), (e) through (g), and (k).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (m).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (n) and (o).

The 2021 amendment

, effective January 1, 2022, added (p).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 47, § 1, amended subsection (s) of W.S. 39-6-302, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendment to § 39-6-209(s) by ch. 47 was subsequently incorporated into subsection (f) of this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

W.S. 39-14-202(a)(iv) through (x), referred to in subsection (k) of this section, was repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 207, and Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2003, ch. 130, § 2, provides: “The oil and gas conservation commission and the department of revenue shall on or before December 1 of 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006 and 2007 jointly report to the joint revenue interim committee of the legislature concerning tertiary production qualifying for the exemption provided in W.S. 39-14-205(c). The report shall include the amount of production, operators, number of wells, amount of severance taxes paid on that production, amount of severance taxes exempted under W.S. 39-14-205(c), and ad valorem and sales taxes paid in connection with that production.”

Constitutionality. —

The funding scheme enacted in prior similar section and former §§ 39-6-215, 39-6-305 and 39-6-914, whereby mineral severance tax revenues previously designated for the state highway fund are used to fund an underground storage tank program and are replaced in the highway fund with proceeds from an additional fuel tax, does not violate the requirement of art. 15, § 16, Wyo. Const., that any vehicle or gasoline tax be committed exclusively to public highway expenses. V-1 Oil Co. v. State, 934 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1997).

Producer. —

“Producer,” as used in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-205(f), is ambiguous; applying accepted rules of statutory construction, “producer” means any oil and gas owner that receives a price for the sale of its share of production, including a take-in-kind owner. Therefore, the State Board of Equalization incorrectly determined that the new well incentive trigger price was only the price received by the operator. Lance Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 156, 101 P.3d 899,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2004).

Price. —

“Price” as used in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-205(f) is unambiguous and means gross price, and the court rejected an oil and gas company's argument that had the legislature intended “gross” price, it would have used the word “gross.” Since the term “price” means the full amount paid, there is no need to specify “gross” price. If the legislature intended “net” price, it would have so stated. Lance Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 156, 101 P.3d 899,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2004).

Underground storage tank funding scheme. —

An oil company's bare allegation that the state was funding an underground storage tank program by “fraudulently” transferring fuel tax proceeds required by art. 15, § 16, Wyo. Const., to be used for public highway expenses was insufficient to state a claim for fraud. V-1 Oil Co. v. State, 934 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 39-14-206.
Licenses; permits.

There are no specific applicable provisions for licenses and permits for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-14-207.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns and reports. The following shall apply:

Annually, on or before February 25 of the year following the year of production any person whose crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas production is subject to W.S. 39-14-202(a) shall sign under oath and submit a statement listing the information relative to the production and affairs of the company as the department may require to assess the production;

All information and reports shall be notarized and signed by a person who has legal authority to bind the taxpayer;

For crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas, the taxpayer shall report the location of the production to the county and tax district in which the well or property is located, based upon the actual taxable production produced by the well or property in each county or tax district. Other reasonable methods of reporting the location of production may be approved by the department upon written request of the taxpayer or taxing jurisdiction;

For crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas, the department may presume that the production is located in the county in which production is reported by the taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (iii) of this subsection. The department shall not direct any county to provide relief for taxes paid on taxable valuation which was erroneously reported and certified to the wrong county unless the taxpayer files or is directed to file amended returns within two (2) years of the date of the original certification of the production. Unless there is evidence of bad faith or willful disregard of production circumstances, no taxpayer shall be required to pay taxes on production which was erroneously reported and certified to the wrong county if relief for taxes paid is not allowed under this provision;

Except as provided in paragraph (vi) of this subsection, each taxpayer liable for severance taxes under W.S. 39-14-203(a) shall report monthly to the department. The monthly tax reports are due on or before the twenty-fifth day of the second month following the month of production. Reports shall be filed on forms prescribed by the department. The department may allow extensions for filing returns by regulation;

If a taxpayer’s liability for severance taxes is less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) for the preceding calendar year, monthly reporting requirements are waived and the taxpayer shall report annually. The annual report is due on February 25 of the year following the year in which production occurred. If a taxpayer who reports annually accumulates an annual liability exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00), that taxpayer shall commence reporting monthly as provided in paragraph (v) of this subsection during the production year following the year in which the accumulated tax liability exceeded thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00). It is the taxpayer’s responsibility to notify the department concerning the change from annual to monthly reporting requirements or from monthly to annual reporting.

Payment. The following shall apply:

Annually, on or before October 10 the county treasurer shall send a written statement in sealed envelopes of total ad valorem tax due, itemized as to production description, assessed value and mill levies, to each taxpayer at his last known address. Failure to send notice, or to demand payment of taxes, does not invalidate any taxes due;

Ad valorem taxes are due and payable:

For the 2019 tax year and all preceding tax years, at the office of the county treasurer of the county in which the taxes are levied. Fifty percent (50%) of the taxes are due on and after September 1 and payable on and after November 10 in each year and the remaining fifty percent (50%) of the taxes are due on and after March 1 and payable on and after May 10 of the succeeding calendar year except as hereafter provided. If the entire tax is paid on or before December 31, no interest or penalty is chargeable;

Effective January 1, 2020 for tax year 2020 and each year thereafter, ad valorem taxes are due as provided in W.S.

39-13-113

.

Except as provided in paragraph (iv) of this subsection, each taxpayer liable for severance taxes under W.S. 39-14-203(a) shall pay monthly tax payments to the department. The payment shall be determined by the taxpayer based on the value of the gross product of the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas produced and saved during the second preceding month, and tax computed on value at rates prescribed by W.S. 39-14-204(a). The monthly tax payments are due on or before the twenty-fifth day of the second month following the month of production. If the report the taxpayer is required to file shows tax due, the taxpayer shall pay the tax due when the report is filed. The department may allow extensions for paying taxes by regulation. The department may, if an extension is granted, request the payment of the reasonable estimate of ninety percent (90%) of the tax by the statutory due date, with the remaining tax remitted with the extended return;

If a taxpayer’s liability for severance taxes is less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) for the preceding calendar year, monthly payment requirements are waived and the taxpayer shall pay the tax annually. The annual report and payment are due on February 25 of the year following the year in which production occurred. If a taxpayer who pays annually accumulates an annual liability exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00), that taxpayer shall commence remitting tax payments as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection during the production year following the year in which the accumulated tax liability exceeded thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00). It is the taxpayer’s responsibility to notify the department concerning the change from annual to monthly payment requirements or from monthly to annual payment.

Timelines. Except as otherwise specifically provided, there are no general applicable provisions for timelines for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2020 ch. 142, § 2, effective March 24, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

redesignated former (b)(ii) as the introductory language of (b)(ii) and (b)(ii)(A); in present (b)(ii)(A), added “For the 2019 tax year and all preceding tax years,” at the beginning; and added (b)(ii)(B) and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2020, ch. 142, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2020.

Statute not to be applied retroactively. —

Where the Wyoming Department of Revenue (DOR) changed the allocation of a company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 39-13-103(b)(xv), 39-14-107(a)(iii), 39-14-207(a)(iv), 39-14-307(a)(iii), 39-14-407(a)(iii), 39-14-507(a)(iii), 39-14-607(a)(iii), and 39-14-707(a)(iii) did not apply retroactively because there was substantial evidence that the events triggering the dispute in this case occurred prior to the enactment of former Wyo. Stat. § 39-2-201(j) in that the production, the discovery of the mis-allocation and the notice of the mis-allocation all occurred prior to the enactment and effective date of § 39-2-201(j). BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

Reporting of oil production should be done at wellhead. —

Wyoming Department of Revenue properly reallocated a production company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county because former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-2-201(e) always contemplated that reporting of oil production should be done at the wellhead, and the enactment of former Wyo. Stat. Ann § 39-2-213 (currently Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-207(a)(iii)) did not constitute a ‘change,’ but only a restatement of what general practice had always been contemplated, the practice that was generally in place, and the practice that should generally continue. BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Exxon Mobil Corp. 2002 WY 151, 55 P.3d 714,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2002); Merit Energy Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2013 WY 145,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 151

, 2013 WL 6122394 (Nov 21, 2013).